Idaho, session 2026, H0587.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 58-1504, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
58-1504. RANGELAND IMPROVEMENT ACCOUNT -- ADMINISTERED BY DEPART-
MENT. (1) There is hereby established in the state treasury an account to
be known as the rangeland improvement account. Moneys in the rangeland im-
provement account are hereby continuously appropriated to be used solely for
the purposes provided by this chapter.
(2) The account shall consist of moneys received by the state from
sales, leases, fees, grants, or appropriations from the state or federal
government, and grants from private foundations. Interest earned on moneys
in the account shall be retained in the account.
(3) The department shall administer the account and distribute account
moneys in accordance with section 58-1505, Idaho Code.
(4) The department shall provide an annual report to the joint finance-
appropriations committee, senate resources and environment committee, and
house resources and conservation committee. The report shall provide for
all sources and uses of the moneys in the rangeland improvement account for
the preceding fiscal year.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.